Maryland, session 2026, HB0519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1102.
(a) (1) On the premises, or on adjacent property over which a license holder
has ownership or control, a license holder:
(i) may allow piped–in background music or one television screen;
but
(ii) unless issued a permit described in this section that authorizes
the activity, may not allow:
– 1 –

Ch. 854 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the playing of music, including live music;
2. the operation of a karaoke machine;
3. the playing of music by a disc jockey; or
4. [dancing,] floor shows[,] or any other similar type of
entertainment.
(2) The Board may issue a permit described in this section only if the Board
finds that:
(i) the applicant can control the individuals using the licensed
premises;
(ii) the operation of the premises under the permit will not unduly
disturb the peace of the residents of the neighborhood in which the place of business is
located; and
(iii) the issuing of the permit:
1. is necessary to accommodate the public;
2. will not be detrimental to the public welfare; and
3. will not violate a county fire, health, or building
regulation.
(b) (1) There is a [music] BACKGROUND ENTERTAINMENT permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class D license, or a Class H license.
(3) The permit authorizes the playing of:
(I) MORE THAN ONE TELEVISION; AND
(II) recorded music or [live music with not more than two musicians]
PIPED–IN BACKGROUND MUSIC.
(4) The permit holder may not allow [dancing,] floor shows[,] or similar
live entertainment.
(5) The annual permit fee is $100.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 854
(c) (1) There is [an] A GENERAL entertainment permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of a Class B license, a Class
BLX license, a Class D license, or a Class H license.
(3) The permit authorizes:
(i) THE HOLDER TO PROVIDE THE ENTERTAINMENT ALLOWED
UNDER A BACKGROUND ENTERTAINMENT PERMIT;
(II) live music with not more than four musicians; and
[(ii)] (III) the playing of:
1. [more than one television] TRIVIA GAMES;
2. a karaoke machine; and
3. music by a disc jockey.
(4) (I) The permit holder may not allow [dancing,] floor shows[,] or
similar live entertainment.
(II) IF THE ENTERTAINMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION WILL OCCUR OUTSIDE, THE AREA USED FOR THE EVENT
SHALL BE AT LEAST 100 FEET FROM ANY RESIDENTIALLY ZONED PROPERTY.
(5) The annual permit fees are:
(i) $200 for a holder of a beer and wine license; and
(ii) $300 for a holder of a beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) (1) There is a [dancing] FULL ENTERTAINMENT permit.
(2) The Board may issue the permit to a holder of:
(i) a Class B license;
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class
BLX license;
(iii) a Class C license;
(iv) a Class D license; or
– 3 –

Ch. 854 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(v) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, a Class H
license.
(3) The permit authorizes the holder to provide:
(I) THE ENTERTAINMENT ALLOWED UNDER A GENERAL
ENTERTAINMENT PERMIT; AND
(II) music, [dancing] A PERMANENT DANCE FLOOR, A STAGE
AREA, FLOOR SHOWS, and other legal forms of entertainment.
(4) (i) The Board may not issue the permit to a holder of a Class BLX
license or a Class H license if the premises for which the Class BLX license or Class H
license is issued is within 1,000 feet in a straight line from entry to entry from a place of
worship or school.
(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Board
may issue the permit to the holder of a Class H license if the licensed premises is located
within 1,000 feet in a straight line from entry to entry from a school located at the Annapolis
Mall.
(III) IF THE ENTERTAINMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION WILL OCCUR OUTSIDE, THE AREA USED FOR THE EVENT
SHALL BE AT LEAST 100 FEET FROM ANY RESIDENTIALLY ZONED PROPERTY.
(5) The annual permit fees are:
(i) $200 for a holder of a beer and wine license;
(ii) $400 for a holder of a beer, wine, and liquor license; and
(iii) no charge for a holder of a Class C license.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –